West Virginia, session 2026, SB310.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 8 - 1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §17A-2A-8 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 22, 2025, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (compulsory motor vehicle liability insurance, 91 CSR 13), is authorized.